Massachusetts, session 194th, S2928.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) For the purpose of this act, the following terms shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Celiac disease”, an autoimmune condition where the immune system reacts to gluten.
'Commissioner'', the commissioner of public health.
“Department”, the department of public health.
“Health care provider”, any: (i) doctor of medicine, registered nurse or registered
pharmacist, licensed pursuant to chapter 112 of the General Laws; (ii) intern, resident, fellow or
medical officer licensed pursuant to section 9 of said chapter 112; (iii) hospital, clinic or nursing
of 3

home licensed pursuant to chapter 111 of the General Laws and its agents and employees; (iv)
public hospital and its agents and employees; or (v) integrated health care delivery network
comprising 1 or more hospitals licensed under section 51 of said chapter 111 and affiliated
providers operating under common ownership or control.
(b) The department shall establish a 3-year pilot program to evaluate the potential of
including the screening of celiac disease by health care providers when conducting screenings of
cholesterol and lipids for 12 year olds in the commonwealth.
(c) The program shall: (i) improve early detection of celiac disease in children; (ii) help
reduce long-term health consequences; and (iii) support families navigating a diagnosis of celiac
disease.
(d) Health care providers within the commonwealth shall be allowed to participate in the
program at no additional cost. Health care providers in the program shall collect data relative to
celiac disease screenings as determined by the department for the annual report pursuant to
subsection (i).
(e) The program shall assess the feasibility, accuracy and outcomes of celiac disease
screenings for 12 year olds.
(f) The department shall provide educational materials and resources to support families
of children diagnosed with celiac disease.
(g) The department shall engage with health care providers, health insurers and patient
advocacy groups to ensure the program addresses the needs of children diagnosed with celiac
disease in the commonwealth.
of 3

(h) Subject to appropriation, the department shall allocate funding necessary to support
the implementation and evaluation of the program.
(i) The commissioner shall prepare an annual report that shall include: (i) an evaluation of
the program’s effectiveness in screening for celiac disease in 12 years olds; (ii) analysis of cost
savings and the financial sustainability of screening for celiac disease in children; (iii) collected
data by health care providers pursuant to subsection (d); and (iv) any recommendations for
expansion of screening for celiac disease in the commonwealth. The annual report shall be
submitted, not later than December 31 of each year of the program, to the chairs of the joint
committee on public health, the chairs of the joint committee on health care financing and the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
of 3